North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55D. Filings, Names, and Registered Agents for Corporations, Nonprofit Corporations, and Partnerships.
Article 4. Registered Office and Registered Agent.

§ 55D-30.
Registered office and registered agent required.

Each domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, and limited liability partnership, each foreign limited liability partnership maintaining a statement of foreign registration, and each foreign corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, and limited partnership authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State must continuously maintain in this State:

A registered office that may be the same as any of its places of business or any place where it conducts affairs; and

A registered agent, who must be:

An individual who resides in this State and whose business office is identical with the registered office;

A domestic corporation, nonprofit corporation, or limited liability company whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A foreign corporation, foreign nonprofit corporation, or foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State whose business office is identical with the registered office.

The sole duty of the registered agent to the entity is to forward to the entity at its last known address any notice, process, or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

1901, c. 5; Rev., s. 1243; C.S., s. 1137; 1937, c. 133, ss. 1-3; G.S., ss. 55-38, 55-39; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, s. 17; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(a); 2001-358, ss. 44, 45; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Former Official Comment to

G.S. 55-5-01

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under

G.S. 55-5-01

prior to its amendment in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The requirements that a corporation continuously maintain a registered office and a registered agent at that office are based on the premises that at all times a corporation should have an office where it may be found and a person at that office on whom any notice or process required or permitted by law may be served. This covers not only service of process in connection with litigation but also tax notices and communications from the secretary of state and other governmental offices. The street address of the registered office must appear in the public records maintained by the secretary of state. A mailing address, such as a post office box, is not sufficient since the registered office is the designated location for service of process.

The Model Act assumes that formal communications to the corporation will normally be addressed to the registered agent at the registered office. If the communication itself deals with the registered office or registered agent, however, copies must be sent to the principal office of the corporation. Moreover, the Act authorizes corporations to retain records at, or to provide information to shareholders through, offices other than the registered office. The Model Act consistently recognizes that the registered office may be a “legal” rather than a “business” office.

Many corporations designate their registered office to be a business office of the corporation and a corporate officer at that office to be the registered agent. Since most of the communication to the registered agent at the registered office deals with legal matters, however, corporations often designate their regular legal counsel or his nominee as their registered agent and the counsel’s office as the registered office of the corporation. This practice may also encourage regular communication between the corporation and its legal counsel.

The registered agent need not be an individual. Corporation service companies often provide, as a commercial service, registered offices and registered agents at the office of the corporation service company.

The voluntary dissolution of the corporation does not of itself terminate the authority of the registered agent to accept service of process or other communications on behalf of the dissolved corporation. See section 14.05.

Former North Carolina Commentary to

G.S. 55-5-01

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under

G.S. 55-5-01

prior to its amendment in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Subsection (a) is the same as section 5.01 of the Model Act, except that “nonprofit” has been substituted for “not-for-profit” and “shall” has been substituted for “may” in subdivision (2). Subsection (b) was added to define precisely and exclusively what a registered agent is obligated to do.

§ 55D-31.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

An entity required to maintain a registered office and registered agent under

G.S. 55D-30

may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change that sets forth all of the following:

The name of the entity.

The street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of its current registered office, and the county in which it is located.

If the address of the entity’s registered office is to be changed, the street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the new registered office, and the county in which it is located.

The name of its current registered agent.

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent and the new agent’s written consent (either on the statement or attached to it) to the appointment.

That after the change or changes are made, the addresses of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the address of the agent’s business office, the agent may change the address of the registered office of any entity for which the agent is the registered agent in this State by notifying the entity in writing of the change and signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a statement that complies with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and recites that the entity has been notified of the change.

A domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited liability limited partnership, registered limited liability partnership, foreign corporation, foreign limited liability company, or foreign limited liability partnership may change its registered office or registered agent by including in its annual report required by

G.S. 55-16-22

, 57D-2-24, 59-84.4, or 59-210 the information and any written consent required by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 31; Rev., s. 1176; C.S., s. 1133; G.S., s. 55-34; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, ss. 6, 7; 1965, c. 298, s. 1; 1967, c. 823, s. 17; 1973, c. 262; c. 469, s. 3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 3; 2001-358, ss. 44, 45; 2001-387, ss. 167, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 14.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-5-02

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-5-02 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Changes of registered office or registered agent are usually routine matters which do not affect the rights of shareholders. The purpose of this section is to permit these changes without a formal amendment of the articles of incorporation, without approval of the shareholders, and, indeed, even without formal approval of the board of directors.

Changes of registered office or registered agent are often of particular concern to corporation service companies which routinely serve as registered agent and routinely provide a registered office for literally thousands of corporations within many states.

Experience with the change of registered agent and registered office provisions in earlier versions of the Model Act and the statutes of many states revealed several minor problems with these largely formal provisions that are addressed in the revised Model Act.

Changes of registered office or registered agent need not be authorized by the board of directors. Many changes (such as the name of a specific registered agent at a registered office) are so routine that they should not require action by the board of directors, particularly in publicly held corporations.

In the case of a change of registered agent, the written consent of the new registered agent is required. This is designed to prevent naming persons as registered agents without their knowledge.

The procedure by which a registered agent may change the street address of the registered office applies to any location within the state and the agent is expressly required to notify the corporation of the change. But a facsimile signature of the agent is acceptable since a corporation service company changing its street address may be required to file a form for each of the thousands of corporations for which it serves as registered agent and to notify each corporation of the change.

Resignation of the registered agent is separately treated in section 5.03.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-5-02

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-5-02 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The provisions requiring a mailing address (if different from the street address) and the name of the county were added to the Model Act’s provisions.

§ 55D-32.
Resignation of registered agent.

The registered agent of an entity may resign by signing and filing with the Secretary of State a statement of resignation which may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued. The statement must include or be accompanied by a certification from the registered agent that the agent has mailed or delivered to the entity at its last known address written notice of this resignation. This certification shall include the name and title of the individual notified, if any, and the address to which the notice was mailed or delivered.

After filing the statement the Secretary of State shall mail a copy to the registered office (if not discontinued) and a copy to the entity at its principal office address on file with the Secretary of State or, if none is on file, at the address contained in the certification included in or accompanying the statement of resignation.

The agency appointment is terminated, and, if applicable, the registered office discontinued on the 31st day after the date on which the statement was filed.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 31; Rev., s. 1176; C.S., s. 1133; G.S., s. 55-34; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 979, ss. 6, 7; 1965, c. 298, s. 1; 1967, c. 823, s. 17; 1973, c. 262; c. 469, s. 3; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.6; 2001-358, ss. 44, 45; 2001-387, ss. 168, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-5-03

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-5-03 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The resignation of registered agents in states with statutes similar to earlier versions of the Model Act created special problems. Most of these problems arose in connection with corporation service companies who serve as registered agent for an annual fee. If the fee was not paid, the corporation service company obviously desired to terminate the representation promptly. Often the agent did not have a current business address for the corporation and was uncertain whether the corporation was still actively engaged in business. The earlier Model Act provision required the agent to submit his statement of resignation in duplicate and the secretary of state was directed to mail one copy “forthwith . . . to the corporation at its registered office.” This resulted in a circularity in notice: the duplicate was mailed back to the resigned agent who originally filed the copy. The probability that the corporation would receive a copy of the resignation under these circumstances was obviously low.

Section 5.03 resolves the circularity problem by requiring the resigning agent to submit two copies of its statement of resignation, one to be sent to the corporation at its registered office and the other to the corporation “at its principal office.” Mailing to this second address appears to be the only option regularly available to “break the circle” of the corporation “receiving” the notice through an agent whose resignation is being communicated.

This section also permits the discontinuance of the registered office as well as the resignation of the agent. Corporation service companies desiring to resign their agency for nonpayment of fees will normally wish to discontinue the registered office as well as the registered agent.

Amended North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-5-03

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-5-03 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The Model Act was modified in subsection (a) to require that the statement of resignation include or be accompanied by a certification that written notice of the resignation was mailed or delivered to the corporation. The certification must include the name and title of the officer notified (if any) and the address to which the notice of resignation was mailed or delivered.

§ 55D-33.
Service on entities.

Service of process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served on an entity may be served on the registered agent required by

G.S. 55D-30

.

When an entity required to maintain a registered office and registered agent under

G.S. 55D-30

fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this State, or when its registered agent cannot with due diligence be found at the registered office, or when the Secretary of State revokes a certificate of authority or a statement of foreign registration of a foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the Secretary of State becomes an agent of the entity upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process, notice or demand is made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State or any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process, notice or demand and the applicable fee. In the event any such process, notice or demand is served on the Secretary of State in the manner provided by this subsection, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail one of the copies thereof, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the entity at its principal office or, if there is no mailing address for the principal office on file, to the entity at its registered office. Service on an entity under this subsection is effective for all purposes from and after the date of the service on the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all processes, notices and demands served upon the Secretary of State under this section and shall record therein the date of service and the Secretary of State’s action with reference thereto.

Nothing in this section affects the right to serve any process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon an entity in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

History.

1937, c. 133, ss. 1-3; G.S., s. 55-39; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 33; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 43; 2001-358, ss. 44, 45; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-5-04

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-5-04 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Somewhat the same circularity problem that arose in connection with the resignation of registered agents (see the Official Comment to section 5.03) also sometimes arose in connection with service of process under statutes based on the former Model Act provision. Under that provision, if service could not be made on the registered agent at its registered office, a duplicate of the process was forwarded to the secretary of state who served it at the registered office (where the agent previously could not be found). It is unlikely that this arrangement resulted in the copy being forwarded routinely to the corporation. Instead of providing for service on the secretary of state if service cannot be perfected on the registered agent, therefore, section 5.04 provides for service by registered or certified mail addressed to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report.

If service is not perfected on the corporation at its registered office, section 5.04(b) provides that service is deemed perfected at the earliest of:

the date the corporation receives the mail;

the date shown on the return receipt if the receipt is signed on behalf of the corporation;

five days after the certified or registered mail is delivered to the post office or deposited in the mail by the person seeking to serve the corporation, if the return receipt was not returned or not signed on behalf of the corporation.

Section 5.04 also simplifies the recordkeeping requirements of the secretary of state, who is no longer required to keep records of service of process on domestic corporations.

(2) the date shown on the return receipt if the receipt is signed on behalf of the corporation;

(3) five days after the certified or registered mail is delivered to the post office or deposited in the mail by the person seeking to serve the corporation, if the return receipt was not returned or not signed on behalf of the corporation.

Section 5.04 also simplifies the recordkeeping requirements of the secretary of state, who is no longer required to keep records of service of process on domestic corporations.

Section 5.04(c) provides that this section does not prescribe the only, or necessarily the required, means of serving a corporation. Service may also be perfected under civil practice statutes, under rules of civil procedure, or under statutes that provide special service requirements applicable to certain types of corporations.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-5-04

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-5-04 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Subsection (a) follows the Model Act except for specifying that the registered agent is “an” agent rather than “the” agent for service on the corporation. Subsections (b), (c) and (d) bring forward former G.S. 55-15(b), (c) and (d), with minor conforming changes in subsection (b). Service on the Secretary of State under the circumstances permitted by former G.S. 55-15(b) has been retained as an alternative.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 44 and 45, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-5-04 as this section; and rewrote the section.